Colorado, session 2026A, HB1330.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-103, amend
(15)(a) and (15)(c) introductory portion; and repeal (15)(b) as follows:
44-3-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(15) "Entertainment district" means an area that:
(a) Is located within a SINGLE municipality a OR city and county
or the unincorporated area of a SINGLE county and is designated in
accordance with section 44-3-301 (11)(b) as an entertainment district;
AND
(b) Comprises no more than one hundred acres; and
(c) Contains, at least twenty thousand square feet of premises that,
at the time the district is created, is A COMBINED TOTAL LICENSED
PREMISES OF AT LEAST FIVE THOUSAND SQUARE FEET FOR TWO OR MORE
LICENSEES THAT ARE licensed pursuant to this article 3 as:
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-301, amend
(11)(b) and (11)(f) as follows:
-2- 1330

44-3-301. Licensing in general - rules - tastings -
entertainment district - promotional association - educational classes.
(11) (b) A governing body of a local licensing authority may
create an entertainment district by adopting an ordinance or resolution.
An entertainment district shall not exceed one hundred acres. The
ordinance or resolution may impose stricter limits than required by this
subsection (11) on the size, security or hours of operation of any common
consumption area created within the entertainment district.
(f) (I) A local licensing authority may establish application
procedures and a fee for certifying a promotional authority or authorizing
attachment to a common consumption area. The authority shall establish
the fee in an amount designed to reasonably offset the cost of
implementing this subsection (11).
(II) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3 TO THE
CONTRARY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF a local LICENSING authority may set
the DAYS AND hours during which a common consumption area and
attached licensed premises IN OR ON THE PERIMETER OF A COMMON
CONSUMPTION AREA AND AUTHORIZED TO BE ATTACHED TO A COMMON
CONSUMPTION AREA may SELL OR serve alcohol BEVERAGES and the
DURING WHICH THEIR customers may consume alcohol BEVERAGES EITHER
IN THE COMMON CONSUMPTION AREA WHEN THE COMMON CONSUMPTION
AREA IS IN OPERATION OR ON THEIR LICENSED PREMISES; EXCEPT THAT THE
DAYS AND HOURS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (11)(f)(II)
MUST NOT BE MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN THE DAYS AND HOURS ALLOWED
IN SECTION 44-3-901 (6)(b)(I).
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE
3 TO THE CONTRARY, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A LOCAL LICENSING
-3- 1330

AUTHORITY MAY ESTABLISH THE DAYS AND HOURS OF OPERATION FOR THE
ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT AND, WHEN IN OPERATION, THE DAYS AND
HOURS DURING WHICH LICENSEES IN THE ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT THAT
ARE LISTED IN SECTION 44-3-103 (15)(c) MAY SELL OR SERVE ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES IN THEIR LICENSED PREMISES; EXCEPT THAT THE DAYS AND
HOURS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (11)(f)(III) MUST
NOT BE MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN THE DAYS AND HOURS ALLOWED IN
SECTION 44-3-901 (6)(b)(I).
(IV) Before certifying a promotional association, the local
licensing authority shall consider the reasonable requirements of the
neighborhood, the desires of the adult inhabitants as evidenced by
petitions, remonstrances, or otherwise, and all other reasonable
restrictions that are or may be placed upon the neighborhood by the local
licensing authority.
(V) PRIOR TO THE HEARING TO DETERMINE WHETHER TO APPROVE
THE ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION THAT WOULD CREATE THE
ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT, THE CITY COUNCIL OR BOARD OF COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS SHALL CONSULT THE COUNTY SHERIFF AND ANY
MUNICIPAL POLICE DEPARTMENT THAT HAS JURISDICTION OVER THE AREA
WHERE THE ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT IS TO BE LOCATED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-910, amend
(1)(b) and (1)(f); repeal (1)(c) and (1)(d); and add (5) and (6) as follows:
44-3-910. Common consumption areas - rules.
(1) A promotional association or attached licensed premises shall
not:
(b) Sell or provide an alcohol beverage to a customer for
consumption within the common consumption area but not within the
-4- 1330

licensed premises in a container that is larger than sixteen ounces PERMIT
INDIVIDUALS TO ENTER AN ATTACHED LICENSED PREMISES FROM THE
COMMON CONSUMPTION AREA WITH AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE PURCHASED
FROM A DIFFERENT ATTACHED LICENSED PREMISES;
(c) Sell or provide an alcohol beverage to a customer for
consumption within the common consumption area but not within the
licensed premises unless the container is disposable and contains the
name of the vendor in at least twenty-four-point font;
(d) Permit customers to leave the licensed premises with an
alcohol beverage unless the beverage container complies with subsections
(1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section;
(f) Operate the common consumption area in an area that exceeds
the maximum SIZE authorized by this article 3 or by the local licensing
authority;
(5) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ADOPT RULES TO
PRESERVE PUBLIC SAFETY AND THE PROPER REGULATION AND CONTROL OF
THE SALE AND SERVICE OF ALCOHOL BEVERAGES UNDER THIS SECTION.
THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY, BY RULE, ESTABLISH DIFFERENT
REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSED PREMISES WITHIN AN ENTERTAINMENT
DISTRICT THAT ARE NOT ATTACHED TO A COMMON CONSUMPTION AREA
AND LICENSED PREMISES WITHIN AN ENTERTAINMENT DISTRICT THAT ARE
ATTACHED TO A COMMON CONSUMPTION AREA.
(6) ONLY LICENSED PREMISES AUTHORIZED TO ATTACH TO A
COMMON CONSUMPTION AREA BY THE LOCAL LICENSING AUTHORITY
UNDER SECTION 44-3-301 (11)(e) AND (11)(f) MAY SELL OR SERVE
ALCOHOL BEVERAGES FOR CONSUMPTION WITHIN THE COMMON
CONSUMPTION AREA.
-5- 1330

SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- 1330